Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.530

Expenses—How paid—Delegates receive filing fee.

The delegates attending the convention shall be paid the amount of their filing fee, upon vouchers approved by the president and secretary of the convention and state warrants issued thereon and payable from the general fund of the state treasury. The delegates shall receive no other compensation or mileage. All other necessary expenses of the convention shall be payable from the general fund of the state upon vouchers approved by the president and secretary of the convention.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1442. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.74.140; prior: 1933 c 181 s 10; RRS s 5249-10. Formerly RCW 29.74.140.]